Tennessee, session 114, HB1327.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 13-23-134, is amended by deleting
subsection (f).
SECTION 2. Section 6 of Chapter 971 of the Public Acts of 2024, is amended by
deleting the second sentence in its entirety.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 003083